Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 10. Kentucky Economic Development Partnership

154.10-010.
Kentucky Economic Development Partnership — Membership — Vacancies — Meetings.

The Kentucky Economic Development Partnership, a board governing the Cabinet for Economic Development, is created and established, performing essential governmental and public functions and purposes essential to improving and promoting the health and general welfare of the people of the Commonwealth through sustainable economic development, as prescribed in KRS 154.1-020.
(1) (a)

The Kentucky Economic Development Partnership, a board governing the Cabinet for Economic Development, is created and established, performing essential governmental and public functions and purposes essential to improving and promoting the health and general welfare of the people of the Commonwealth through sustainable economic development, as prescribed in KRS 154.1-020.

The board shall have reorganization powers and authority as prescribed in KRS 12.028 and shall constitute an administrative body as defined in KRS 12.010, but it and the cabinet shall not be subject to reorganization by the Governor, KRS Chapter 12 notwithstanding.

The board shall serve as the governing body of the cabinet and shall exercise all powers and authorities conferred upon it by statute, including, but not limited to, the following functions:

Strategic planning;

Finance;

Business assistance;

Marketing and promotion;

Community development;

Workforce development;

Innovation; and

All economic development powers and authorities not specifically conferred by statute to another agency or authority of state government.

The board shall consist of thirteen (13) voting members and two (2) nonvoting members. The thirteen (13) voting members shall consist of the Governor, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet, the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the secretary of the Labor Cabinet, and eight (8) private sector members who shall be appointed by the Governor. The secretary of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet shall serve as a voting member upon the absence of the Governor. The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development and the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall serve as nonvoting members.

The governing bodies of each of the following organizations shall nominate two (2) persons from each of the six (6) Congressional districts of the Commonwealth and two (2) persons from the state at large, as candidates for appointment as private sector members to the board:

The Kentucky Association for Economic Development;

The Kentucky Association of Manufacturers;

The Kentucky State AFL-CIO;

The Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation;

The Kentucky Chamber of Commerce; and

The National Federation of Independent Businesses/Kentucky.

The Governor shall select the original eight (8) private sector members from the aggregation of the lists provided pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, with at least one (1) appointment being chosen from each organization’s list and at least one (1) appointment being chosen from each Congressional district. Appointments to vacancies shall be made in the same manner as prescribed in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, except that there is no requirement that the vacancy be filled from the same organization’s list as the original appointment.

All appointments shall be for four (4) years.

In making appointments to the board, the Governor shall assure broad geographical representation, as well as representation from the major sectors of Kentucky’s economy by leading executives with a knowledge of the problems of large and small businesses, local economic development, and the transfer of research and development from the laboratory to the marketplace. In filling vacancies, the Governor shall assure the continuing representation on the board of broad constituencies of Kentucky’s economy, including manufacturing and agriculture.

Vacancies on the board which may occur from time to time shall be filled as follows:

Any vacancy which occurs shall be filled for the unexpired term in accordance with the procedures established in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

If any private sector member misses more than two (2) consecutive meetings of the board, then that position shall be declared vacant and filled in accordance with this section.

The board shall meet semiannually and at other times upon call of the chairman or a majority of the board.

A quorum shall be a majority of the voting membership of the board.

A quorum shall be required to organize and conduct the business of the board, except that an affirmative vote of seven (7) or more members of the entire board shall be required to terminate the employment of the cabinet’s secretary, and to adopt or amend the strategic plan.

Private sector members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for all reasonable, necessary, and actual expenses.

All existing duties, responsibilities, functions, personnel, programs, funds, obligations, records, and real and personal property of the Cabinet for Economic Development, as of July 14, 1992, shall be under the authority and control of the board.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 194, § 14, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 48, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 32, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 38, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 192, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

154.10-020.
Officers — Executive committee.

The Governor shall be the chairman of the board and upon his absence the secretary of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet shall serve as chairman.

The board shall elect from among the private sector members a vice chairman of the board. The initial term of office for the vice chairman shall expire December 31, 1994, and the subsequent terms of office of the vice chairman shall be for a period of two (2) years.

Upon the absence of both the Governor and the secretary of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet, the vice chairman shall serve as chairman.

The board may establish an executive committee consisting of the chairman, the vice chairman, the secretary of the cabinet, and not more than three (3) additional board members selected jointly by the chairman and vice chairman. The executive committee shall have such authority as the board delegates to it, except that the board shall not delegate to the executive committee the authority to take actions requiring approval by a majority of the entire board under KRS 154.10-010(10).

The secretary and other officers and employees of the cabinet shall not be required to disclose confidential information concerning existing businesses or business prospects with which the board or cabinet is dealing, including the identity of the businesses, to members of the board other than the executive committee. The executive committee shall provide advice and assistance to the secretary in negotiations with existing and prospective businesses. In the event the cabinet enters into an agreement with a business entity which requires approval by the General Assembly, the agreement shall be presented by the secretary to the board, which shall make a recommendation of approval or disapproval of the agreement to the General Assembly.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

154.10-030.
Powers and authority.

The board shall have all the powers and authority, not explicitly prohibited by statute, necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the functions, duties, and responsibilities of the board and the cabinet, including, but not limited to, the following:

Serving as the governing body of the Cabinet for Economic Development;

Suing and being sued;

Adopting, using, and altering at will a corporate seal;

Approving economic development programs and projects;

Discharging the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development;

Approving the state’s strategic economic development plan and subsequent implementation plans;

Providing for and directing the state’s economic development strategic planning process;

Evaluating the performance and effectiveness of the Commonwealth’s economic development systems, including:

The establishment of benchmarks; and

Program review;

Reporting to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the people of the Commonwealth regarding its functions, duties, and responsibilities, including, but not limited to:

The Commonwealth’s strategic economic development plan;

Program initiatives and implementation plans;

Systems evaluations;

Benchmarks;

Program evaluation; and

Activities of the cabinet;

Soliciting, borrowing, accepting, receiving, investing, and expending funds from any public or private source;

Making grants, loans, and investments; guaranteeing and insuring loans, leases, bonds, notes, or other indebtedness, whether public or private; issuing letters of credit; and making loans to financial institutions to facilitate financing of all or part of an export-related transaction including, but not limited to, pre-export working capital financing and post-export receivable financing;

Constructing, acquiring by gift, purchase, installment purchase, or lease, and reconstructing, improving, repairing, or equipping any project or any part of a project; and entering into a lease for the use or sale of a project;

Making loans and participating in the making of loans; undertaking commitments to make loans and mortgages; buying and selling loans and mortgages at public or private sale; rewriting loans and mortgages; discharging loans and mortgages; foreclosing on mortgages and commencing any action to protect or enforce a right conferred upon the cabinet or placed within the control, authority, and responsibility of the cabinet under the provisions of this chapter; bidding for and purchasing property which was the subject of the mortgage at a foreclosure or other sale, and acquiring or taking possession of the property and, in that event, completing, administering, paying the principal and interest on obligations incurred in connection with the property; and disposing of and otherwise dealing with the property in a manner as may be necessary or desirable to protect the interests of the cabinet;

Entering into a lease for the use or sale of a project; acquiring or contracting from any person, public entity, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, or entity, leaseholds, real or personal property, or any interest in real or personal property; owning, holding, clearing, improving, and rehabilitating and selling, assigning, exchanging, transferring, conveying, leasing, mortgaging, or otherwise disposing of or encumbering leaseholds, real or personal property, or any interest in real or personal property as is convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter;

Procuring insurance against any loss in connection with the cabinet’s property, assets, or activities;

Charging, imposing and collecting fees and charges in connection with any transaction, and providing for reasonable penalties for delinquent payment of fees or charges;

Indemnifying and procuring insurance indemnifying members and officers of the board, and the cabinet and members and officers of the finance committee of the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority as provided in KRS 154.20-010, from personal loss or accountability from liability asserted by any person on the bonds or notes of the cabinet or authority, or any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of bonds, notes, insurance, or guarantees; or by reason of acquisition, construction, ownership, or operation of any project funded in whole or part by the cabinet or authority; or by reason of any other action taken or the failure to act by the cabinet or authority;

Mortgaging or creating security interests in a project or any part of a project, or in a lease or loan, or in the rents, revenues, or sums to be paid in favor of the holders of the bonds or notes issued by the cabinet;

Conveying or releasing a project or any part of a project to a lessee, purchaser, or borrower under any agreement after provision has been made for the retirement in full of the bonds or notes issued for that project under the terms and conditions provided in the agreement, or as may be agreed with the holders of the bonds or notes, or as may otherwise be agreed with the holders of the bonds or notes;

Issuing non-appropriation-supported bonds and notes including, but not limited to, commercial paper, refund bonds, and notes; paying the costs of issuance of bonds and notes; paying interest on bonds and notes;

Making and entering into contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and execution of its powers;

Employing consultants and other persons and employees as may be required in the judgment of the board, essential to the cabinet’s operations, functions, and responsibilities;

Providing technical assistance regarding any economic or job development project, program, or activity;

Delegating any powers, duties, responsibilities, and authority to any division, agency, or authority under its control and administration;

Reorganizing, pursuant to KRS 12.028, any organizational unit or administrative body under its control and jurisdiction;

Promulgating administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, governing its powers, duties, and responsibilities as prescribed in this chapter and governing the powers, duties, and responsibilities delegated to any administrative body transferred to the cabinet by law or otherwise placed within its control and responsibility; and

Doing all other things necessary or convenient to achieve its objectives and purposes which are not explicitly prohibited by statute.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 194, § 15, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 149, § 208, effective July 12, 2006.

154.10-035.
Issuance of economic development revenue bonds and anticipation notes — Uses — Treatment.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, the board is authorized to exercise the following power:

The board may provide for the issuance of economic development revenue bonds by the cabinet, for the purpose of providing funds and moneys to enable the cabinet to exercise and fulfill the powers and authority set forth in KRS 154.10-030, to enter into agreements with governmental agencies and private companies, corporations, partnerships, and other such entities, acquire and lease projects to governmental agencies and private companies, corporations, cabinets, and other such entities, purchase obligations of governmental agencies issued for economic development projects, and make loans or grants for economic development projects, and to enable the cabinet generally to carry out and effectuate its proper purposes under this chapter. In anticipation of the issuance of the revenue bonds, the board may provide for the issuance at one (1) time, or from time to time, of revenue bond anticipation notes pursuant to the general laws of the state. The principal of and the interest on the revenue bonds or notes shall be payable solely from revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes. Any such notes may be made payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes, or in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, or should the board deem it financially practicable to pay the notes directly from revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes, the notes may be paid from any revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes. Prior to the issuance of the bonds or notes, the cabinet shall submit any proposed issue to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for its review and determination in accordance with provisions of KRS 45.810.

The revenue bonds or notes of the cabinet shall be dated and may be redeemable prior to maturity at the option of the board at prices and under terms and conditions determined by the board. Any bonds or notes shall bear interest at the rate or rates, shall be payable annually or at shorter intervals, and may bear conversion privileges determined by the board. Notes shall mature at the time or times not exceeding five (5) years from their date or dates, and revenue bonds shall mature at the time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their date or dates as may be determined by the board. The board shall determine the form and manner of execution of the bonds or notes, and shall fix the denomination or denominations and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be any bank or trust company within or without the state. In case any officer of the board whose signature or facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any revenue bonds or notes shall cease to be such officer before the delivery thereof, the signature of the facsimile shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if the officer had remained in office until the delivery. At the time of issuance of variable rate revenue bonds, the board may designate individuals or institutions which, in the sole judgment of the board, have financial market expertise to serve as agent for the board for establishing and changing from time to time, while the variable rate revenue bonds remain outstanding, the rate of interest to be borne by and the price to be paid for the revenue bonds. The rate-setting procedures and authority of each agent shall be set forth in writing, and may include a formula or an index or indices based upon market factors, and shall be established by the board at the time of issuance of the revenue bonds. At the time of the issuance of the revenue bonds, the board shall establish the maximum interest rate to be borne by the revenue bonds. The board shall retain the right to remove or replace any agent at any time and for any reason. The board may provide that said bonds or notes may be executed only with the facsimile signatures of its officers, but said bonds or notes shall be executed with the manual signature of a bank or trust company designated by the board as registrar and paying agent.

All revenue bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this chapter shall have and are hereby declared to possess all of the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the laws of the state. The board may sell the revenue bonds or notes in the manner, either at public or private negotiated sale, and for the price, as it may determine will best effect the purpose of this chapter. If revenue bonds are sold at public, competitive sale, the revenue bonds shall be sold after newspaper advertising conforming to the requirements of KRS Chapter 424 and competitive bids for the sale of the revenue bonds shall be opened and read publicly by the board at a designated place, day and hour, all of which shall be announced in the advertising made relative thereto.

In its proceedings authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds or notes, the board shall fix and determine contractual provisions with the bondholders relating to the receipt, allocation, pledging, and disbursement of revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes, and may enact and determine terms, conditions, and restrictions pursuant to which additional revenue bonds of the cabinet may be authorized and issued from time to time. The proceedings, determinations, and enactments of the board shall specify that the payment of principal of and interest on all cabinet revenue bonds and notes shall constitute a first charge and lien against all revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes before any such revenues are used, applied, and disbursed for any other valid purposes of the cabinet, including the payment of operation and maintenance costs incident to the operation of the cabinet.

The proceeds of all revenue bonds or notes shall be used solely for the purpose of enabling the cabinet to enter into agreements or interim financing agreements with governmental agencies and private companies, corporations, partnerships, and other entities, to acquire and lease projects to governmental agencies, private companies, corporations, partnerships and other entities, to purchase obligations of governmental agencies issued for economic development projects, to make loans or grants to governmental agencies, private companies, corporations, partnerships, and other such entities for economic development projects, or for any purpose authorized in this chapter. Revenue bond or note proceeds may also be used and applied for the payment of ordinary and necessary expenses in connection with issuance of the revenue bonds or notes, including, but not by way of limitation, a sum equal to any discount in the sale thereof, if discount bids are authorized and permitted by the board, administrative expenses, including the preparation of revenue bonds or notes, publication of notices, printing and other costs, attorneys’ fees, and other ordinary and necessary costs of financing, including the payment of fees to fiscal agents for advice and assistance in the preparation and marketing of revenue bonds or notes.

Prior to the preparation of definitive revenue bonds or notes, the board may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, exchangeable for definitive revenue bonds or notes when the revenue bonds or notes shall have been executed, and are available for delivery. The board shall also provide for the replacement of any revenue bonds or notes that shall have become mutilated or shall have been destroyed or lost. Revenue bonds or notes may be issued under the provisions of this chapter directly by the board without obtaining the consent or acquiescence of any cabinet, division, commission, board, department, or agency of the state other than the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and as provided in KRS 42.420, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things except as specifically required by this chapter and the provisions of the resolution or resolutions of the board authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or notes.

The board shall assume all bond issuance and refunding authority, power, duties, and obligations as existed on July 14, 1992, for the Kentucky Development Finance Authority, and the Kentucky Rural Economic Development Authority; the ability of any of the foregoing organizations to issue industrial revenue bonds under KRS Chapter 103; and the ability of any of the foregoing authorities to issue economic development revenue bonds as provided in this chapter. The board shall also have the authority and power to issue revenue bonds for any other economic development activity as set forth in this chapter.

The board shall for purposes of the Kentucky Revised Statutes be deemed to be the successor issuer for all of the currently issued and outstanding bond issues by the organizations set forth in subsection (2) of this section. The board shall have the authority and the power to reaffirm all existing bond obligations of the organizations in subsection (2) of this section and shall perform all duties, obligations, and requirements as may be necessary and required under the bond documents relating to each and every such issue. The board shall also, in regard to each and every such issue, exercise its authority and power as set forth in this chapter.

In the discretion of the board, any revenue bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the cabinet and corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth. A trust indenture, or the resolution of the board providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or notes, may pledge or assign for the security of the revenue bonds or notes, all or any part of the totality of revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes received and to be received. The trust indenture or resolution of the board may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders which may be reasonable and proper, and not in violation of law, including, but not limited to, covenants and provisions setting forth the duties of the cabinet in relation to the purposes to which revenue bonds and note proceeds may be applied; the disposition or pledging of assets and revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes; and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all such revenues. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth which may act as depository of the proceeds of revenue bonds, notes, or revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes, to furnish such indemnifying bonds, or to pledge such securities as may be required by a trust indenture or resolution of the board. Any trust indenture or board resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders, where a trust indenture has been entered into. In addition to the foregoing, any trust indenture or board resolution may contain other provisions which the board determines to be reasonable and proper for the further security of the holders of any revenue bonds or notes. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of a trust indenture or bond proceedings may be treated as a part of the cost of operating the cabinet, and may be paid from revenues pledged or assigned to the payment of the principal of and the interest on revenue bonds or notes, or from any other funds properly available to the cabinet for bond purposes. However, the payment of operational costs from revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes shall, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, be subordinate to the payment of principal of and interest on cabinet revenue bonds or notes from revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes, it being intended that these principal and interest requirements shall be secured by a prior and paramount lien on gross revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, any trust indenture or board resolution shall provide that, except to the extent the rights afforded to bondholders by this section shall be enforceable and enforced by a trustee under a trust indenture rather than by the bondholders, any holder of revenue bonds or notes issued by the cabinet or any of the coupons appurtenant thereto, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights generally arising under the laws of the Commonwealth, or granted under this chapter, or under a trust indenture, or by the resolution of the board authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds or notes, and may specifically enforce and compel by mandamus the performance of all duties required by this chapter, or by trust indenture, or board resolution, to be performed by the cabinet or by any officer or employee thereof, including, but not limited to, the prompt and full enforcement of the terms and conditions of all assistance agreements to which the cabinet is a party.

The cabinet is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding revenue bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds or notes then outstanding, whether issued by the cabinet under the provisions of this chapter or one (1) of the agencies, authorities or organizations referenced in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of these revenue bonds or notes, and, if determined advisable by the board, for the additional purpose of providing further funds for the carrying out of the proper public and governmental purposes of the cabinet. The issuance and sale of the refunding revenue bonds or notes, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the cabinet in respect of the same, shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter which relate to the issuance of revenue bonds or notes, insofar as these provisions may be applicable.

Refunding revenue bonds or notes may be sold or exchanged directly for outstanding revenue bonds or notes of the cabinet, and if sold, the proceeds thereof shall be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of these outstanding revenue bonds or notes. Pending the application of the proceeds of any refunding revenue bonds, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest, and any redemption premium on the revenue bonds or notes being refunded (and if so provided or permitted in the board resolution authorizing the issuance of the refunding revenue bonds or notes, or in the trust indenture securing the same, to the payment of any interest on the refunding revenue bonds or notes and any expenses in connection with the refunding), the proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America which shall mature or which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof at the option of such holders not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the purposes intended.

Revenue bonds and notes issued by the cabinet under the provisions of this chapter are hereby declared and deemed to be securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. These obligations of the cabinet are hereby declared and determined to be securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth, for the purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the Commonwealth is now, or may hereafter be, authorized by law.

Revenue bonds or notes issued by the cabinet under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof; but the bonds shall be payable as to principal and interest solely from revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes provided therefor under the provisions of this chapter. All such revenue bonds or notes shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that neither the Commonwealth nor the cabinet shall be obligated to pay the same, or the interest thereon, except from revenues made available to the cabinet for bond purposes, as defined in this chapter; and that neither the faith and credit, nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on such revenue bonds or notes.

The Commonwealth, for the specific use and benefit of the cabinet, may cause to be submitted to the voters of the state in a manner provided by Sections 49 and 50 of the Constitution of Kentucky, from time to time, propositions for the incurring of state indebtedness represented by general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth, the proceeds of which are to be made available to the cabinet and used and employed by the cabinet for all proper purposes.

Subject to the provisions of KRS 56.870 to 56.873, the State Property and Buildings Commission or the Kentucky Turnpike Authority may issue bonds for which debt service originates with an appropriation of the General Assembly, and may make the proceeds available to the cabinet for all proper purposes.

Funds appropriated to the cabinet by the General Assembly, including but not limited to repayments of revolving funds established with appropriations of the General Assembly or established with bond issues for which the debt service, issuance costs, reserve fund requirements, insurance premiums or any other expenditures associated with bond issuance are appropriated by the General Assembly, shall not be commingled with other funds made available to the cabinet and shall only be expended for the purposes specified by the General Assembly when the appropriation is made or as approved in subsequent actions of the General Assembly.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 30, effective July 14, 1992.

154.10-040.
Selection and appointment of secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development.

In the selection and appointment of the secretary, the board shall set the qualifications for the position of the secretary, employ a national search firm and conduct a nationwide search for candidates, and select from that list three (3) candidates for secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development. The names of the three (3) candidates shall be submitted to the Governor who shall choose one of them as secretary, except that, if the Governor so chooses, he may reject the first list of names and direct the board to submit a list of three (3) additional names, from which he shall appoint the secretary. Once appointed, the secretary shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

The secretary shall be a person with significant experience and established reputation as an economic development professional.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

154.10-050.
Secretary as chief executive officer — Duties and responsibilities.

The secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the Cabinet for Economic Development and shall possess the professional qualifications appropriate for that office as determined by the board.

The board shall set the salary of the secretary and up to two (2) additional executive officers of the cabinet as determined by the board, which shall be exempt from state employee salary limitations as set forth in KRS 64.640. No executive officer of the cabinet shall be paid a salary greater than that of the secretary.

The secretary shall be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the cabinet and shall report and submit on an annual basis implementation plans to the board as provided in KRS 154.10-060; carry out policy and program directives of the board; coordinate programs of the cabinet with all other agencies of state government having economic development responsibilities; hire all other personnel of the cabinet consistent with state law; and carry out all other duties and responsibilities assigned by state law.

The secretary shall prepare and submit the proposed budget of the cabinet to the chairman who shall present it to the board for final approval. Upon approval, the board shall submit the proposed budget to the Governor’s Office for Policy and Management.

The secretary shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of all assigned duties and responsibilities.

The secretary shall give highest priority consideration in marketing, targeting, and recruiting new businesses, in expanding existing businesses, and in recommending state economic development loans, grants, and incentive programs administered by the authority, to Kentucky counties which have had an average countywide rate of unemployment of fifteen percent (15%) or greater in the most recent twelve (12) consecutive months for which unemployment figures are available, on the basis of the final unemployment figures calculated by the Department of Workforce Investment within the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 2002, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 211, § 62, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 31, effective June 25, 2009; 2014, ch. 89, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective April 10, 2017; 2018 ch. 199, § 8, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 146, § 15, effective June 27, 2019.

154.10-060.
Submission of implementation plans to board.

The secretary shall present annually to the board for its review and approval implementation plans for the approved strategies as set forth in the Commonwealth’s approved strategic economic development plan for which funds will be expended by the cabinet or other agencies receiving funds from the cabinet.

Any agency receiving funds from or through the cabinet shall submit annually implementation plans to the board for its review and approval.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 8, effective July 14, 1992.